Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 8. Arbitration

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators — insurance appraisals or arbitrations, 63 ALR5th 675.

Setting aside arbitration award on ground of interest or bias of arbitrators—torts, 64 ALR5th 475.

5 Am. Jur. 2d Arbitration and Award §§ 148 to 256.

§ 1-21-801.
Procedure
generally.

Any civil cause pending
before a judge may be submitted to the arbitration of three (3) men
by agreement of the parties. Each party shall select one (1) arbitrator
and the two (2) so selected shall choose the third. They shall be
sworn by the judge and proceed in a summary manner to hear the cause.
Any of the arbitrators may administer oaths, issue subpoenas for witnesses
and compel their attendance, and punish for contempt. They shall make
their awards in writing, any two (2) concurring being the award of
all. The award shall be reported to the judge who shall enter judgment
accordingly. The judgment is final unless it is made to appear to
the judge within ten (10) days after the entry of judgment that the
award was obtained by fraud, corruption or any undue means, in which
case the judge shall set aside the award and the case shall stand
for trial as though no award had been made.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 183; R.S. 1887, § 3599; R.S. 1899, § 4509; C.S. 1910, § 5373; C.S. 1920, § 6646; R.S. 1931, § 62-2101; C.S. 1945, § 14-1701; W.S. 1957, § 1-664; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-801; Laws, 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice” throughout.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of agreement between attorney and client to arbitrate disputes arising between them, 26 ALR5th 107.

Participation in arbitration proceedings as waiver of objections to arbitrability under state law, 56 ALR5th 757.

§ 1-21-802.
Appeal
of setting aside award; grounds.

An aggrieved party may
appeal the decision of the judge to set aside the award upon grounds
of fraud, corruption or undue means as in other cases.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 184; R.S. 1887, § 3600; R.S. 1899, § 4510; C.S. 1910, § 5374; C.S. 1920, § 6647; R.S. 1931, § 62-2102; C.S. 1945, § 14-1702; W.S. 1957, § 1-665; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-802; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-803.
Appeal of setting aside award; proceedings in district court.

If on appeal of any such
award, the district court is satisfied the award was obtained by fraud,
corruption or other undue means, the court shall set aside the award
and proceed to hear and determine the cause on the merits.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 185; R.S. 1887, § 3601; R.S. 1899, § 4511; C.S. 1910, § 5375; C.S. 1920, § 6648; R.S. 1931, § 62-2103; C.S. 1945, § 14-1703; W.S. 1957, § 1-666; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-803.

§ 1-21-804.
Appeal of setting aside award; affirmance.

If the court determines
the award was not obtained by fraud, corruption or other undue means,
it shall render judgment thereon for costs of the suit and award execution
as in other cases.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 186; R.S. 1887, § 3602; R.S. 1899, § 4512; C.S. 1910, § 5376; C.S. 1920, § 6649; R.S. 1931, § 62-2104; C.S. 1945, § 14-1704; W.S. 1957, § 1-667; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-804.